New York, session 2025-2026, S3869.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Article 50 of the executive law is redesignated article 60 2 and sections 1000, 1001, 1002 and 1003, as renumbered by chapter 770 of 3 the laws of 1978, are renumbered sections 1500, 1501, 1502 and 1503. 4 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new article 50 to read 5 as follows: 6 ARTICLE 50 7 OFFICE OF EMERGING TECHNOLOGY 8 Section 1000. Office of emerging technology. 9 1001. Functions, powers and duties of the office. 10 § 1000. Office of emerging technology. 1. The office of emerging tech- 11 nology is hereby created within the executive department to have and 12 exercise the functions, powers and duties provided by the provisions of 13 this article and any other provision of law. For purposes of this arti- 14 cle, "the office" means the office of emerging technology. 15 2. The office shall be governed by a board consisting of the following 16 thirteen members to be appointed as follows for two year terms: 17 (a) the director, who shall be appointed by the governor with the 18 consent and approval of the senate; 19 (b) six members appointed by the temporary president of the senate, 20 including three from the majority party and three from the minority 21 party; and 22 (c) six members appointed by the speaker of the assembly, including 23 three from the majority party and three from the minority party. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07110-01-5 S. 3869 2 1 3. Each member shall have expertise and experience related to at least 2 one of the following fields, disciplines, or areas: 3 (a) the use and function of both existing and emerging technology; 4 (b) data privacy and data security; 5 (c) civil rights, civil liberties, and due process and procedural 6 rights; and 7 (d) legal representation of low-income individuals. 8 4. The director shall not act in any capacity for, any organization, 9 agency, or institutions with which the office makes any contract or 10 other arrangement under this article. 11 5. The board shall meet at least four times each year and may estab- 12 lish its own rules and procedures concerning the conduct of its meetings 13 and other affairs not inconsistent with law. 14 § 1001. Functions, powers and duties of the office. 1. The basic func- 15 tion of the office shall be to act as the official state planning and 16 coordinating office for changes in policy, practice and allocation of 17 state resources around emerging technologies, to advise and assist the 18 state agencies in developing policies, plans and programs around emerg- 19 ing technologies, and to provide early indications of beneficial and 20 adverse impacts of the applications of emerging technology and to devel- 21 op and coordinate information which may assist the legislature and the 22 state in responding to emerging technologies. In carrying out such func- 23 tion, the office shall: 24 (a) Identify existing or probable impacts of emerging technology or 25 technological programs. 26 (b) Where possible, ascertain cause-and-effect relationships of the 27 use of emerging technologies. 28 (c) Identify alternative technological methods of implementing specif- 29 ic programs. 30 (d) Identify alternative programs for achieving requisite goals. 31 (e) Examine current and proposed laws, rules, regulations, programs 32 and policies relating to the use of emerging technologies. 33 (f) Examine currently available emerging technologies and evaluate 34 their effectiveness, efficacy and accuracy, provided that such evalu- 35 ation shall include the use of representative datasets according to 36 targeted populations, and disaggregated testing for demographic 37 subgroups by age, gender identity, and race. 38 (g) Propose a comprehensive framework of recommendations for legis- 39 lation, regulations and standards regarding the use of such emerging 40 technologies, if deemed appropriate including but not limited to: 41 (i) permissible uses and purposes for use; 42 (ii) prohibited uses and purposes for use; 43 (iii) minimum standards for accuracy that emerging technologies must 44 achieve in order to be authorized for use by the state and/or public, 45 and auditing requirements to ensure compliance with those standards; 46 (iv) standards for use, management, and protection of information 47 derived from the use of emerging technology, including but not limited 48 to data retention, sharing, access and audit trails; 49 (v) rigorous protections for due process, privacy, free speech and 50 association, and racial, gender, and religious equity; 51 (vi) training requirements for state personnel authorized to use 52 emerging technology; 53 (vii) procedures to address instances in which a person is wrongfully 54 harmed based on inaccurate information derived from use of an emerging 55 technology; and S. 3869 3 1 (viii) disclosure requirements for broad public transparency as well 2 as discovery procedures. 3 (h) Evaluate potential benefits and harms of the use of emerging tech- 4 nologies, taking into account and analyzing the impact of the use of 5 such systems on the workforce, human safety, inequality, governance, and 6 impact on minorities, women, young people, seniors, lesbian, gay, bisex- 7 ual, transgender and gender-nonconforming individuals and individuals 8 with disabilities. 9 (i) Make estimates and comparisons of the impacts of alternative meth- 10 ods and programs. 11 (j) Present findings of completed analyses to the appropriate legisla- 12 tive authorities. 13 (k) Identify areas where additional research or data collection is 14 required to provide adequate support for the assessments and estimates 15 described in this section. 16 2. Assessment activities undertaken by the office may be initiated 17 upon the request of: 18 (a) The director of the office with majority approval of the board; 19 (b) The chair of any committee of either house of the legislature, or 20 of any committee of the legislature, acting for themself or at the 21 request of the ranking minority member or a majority of the committee 22 members; or 23 (c) The commissioner of any state agency. 24 3. The office is authorized to hold public hearings and meetings and 25 to consult with any relevant stakeholders it deems appropriate or neces- 26 sary to seek assistance, data, or other information that will enable the 27 office to carry out its powers and duties. 28 4. The director may appoint assistants, and other officers and employ- 29 ees, committees and consultants as the director may deem necessary, 30 prescribe their powers and duties, and fix their compensation within the 31 amounts appropriated. 32 5. The office may request and receive from any department, division, 33 board, bureau, commission or other agency of the state any information 34 and resources that will enable the office to properly carry out its 35 functions, powers and duties. 36 6. The director may enter contracts or other arrangements as may be 37 necessary for the conduct of the work of the office with any agency 38 within the state, or with any person, firm, association, corporation, or 39 educational institution with or without reimbursement and may make 40 advance, progress and other payments which relate to the duties of the 41 office. 42 7. The office shall submit a report to the governor, the speaker of 43 the assembly and the temporary president of the senate, and any assess- 44 ment requester no later than one year after the effective date of this 45 article and annually thereafter, such report shall contain, at minimum, 46 a summary of the findings of the office required by this section. The 47 report shall also be published on the website of the office of the 48 governor. 49 § 3. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 50 law.